Washington statutes.
RCW 43.330.406

Procurement of geographic information system map—Accountability and oversight structure—Application of public records act.

(1) The department is authorized, through a competitive bidding process, to procure on behalf of the state a geographic information system map detailing high-speed internet infrastructure, service availability, and adoption. This geographic information system map may include adoption information, availability information, type of high-speed internet deployment technology, and available speed tiers for high-speed internet based on any publicly available data.

(2) The department may procure this map either by:

(a) Contracting for and purchasing a completed map or updates to a map from a third party; or

(b) Working directly with the federal communications commission to accept publicly available data.

(3) The department shall establish an accountability and oversight structure to ensure that there is transparency in the bidding and contracting process and full financial and technical accountability for any information or actions taken by a third-party contractor creating this map.

(4) In contracting for purchase of the map or updates to a map in subsection (2)(a) of this section, the department may take no action, nor impose any condition on the third party, that causes any record submitted by a public or private broadband service provider to the third party to meet the standard of a public record as defined in RCW 42.56.010. This prohibition does not apply to any records delivered to the department by the third party as a component of the map. For the purpose of RCW 42.56.010(3), the purchase by the department of a completed map or updates to a map may not be deemed use or ownership by the department of the underlying information used by the third party to complete the map.

(5) Data or information that is publicly available as of July 1, 2009, will not cease to be publicly available due to any provision of chapter 509, Laws of 2009.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 605; 2009 c 509 s 4. Formerly RCW 43.105.374.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.

Findings—Intent—Purpose—Effective date—2009 c 509: See notes following RCW 43.330.400.